resultats/hunspell/catalan.aff
FLAG long
# Model de conjugació: oferir
SFX 72 Y 94
SFX 72 r r/_v_C_Y ir
SFX 72 r nt/_C ir
SFX 72 r t/_v_Y ir
SFX 72 ir t/_v_Y ir
SFX 72 r da/_Y ir
SFX 72 ir ta/_Y ir
SFX 72 r ts/_Y ir
SFX 72 ir ts/_Y ir
SFX 72 r des/_Y ir
SFX 72 ir tes/_Y ir
SFX 72 ir eixo/_Z ir
SFX 72 r sc/_Z ir
SFX 72 ir esc/_Z ir
SFX 72 ir eixes/_Z ir
SFX 72 r xes/_Z ir
SFX 72 ir eix/_Z ir
SFX 72 r x/_Z ir
SFX 72 r m/_Z ir
SFX 72 r u/_Z ir
SFX 72 ir eixen/_Z ir
SFX 72 r xen/_Z ir
SFX 72 r a/_Z ir
SFX 72 r es/_Z ir
SFX 72 r a/_Z ir
SFX 72 ir íem/_Z ir
SFX 72 ir íeu/_Z ir
SFX 72 r en/_Z ir
SFX 72 ir í/_Z ir
SFX 72 r res/_Z ir
SFX 72 ir í/_Z ir
SFX 72 ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 72 ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 72 r ren/_Z ir
SFX 72 r ré/_Z ir
SFX 72 r ràs/_Z ir
SFX 72 r rà/_Z ir
SFX 72 r rem/_Z ir
SFX 72 r reu/_Z ir
SFX 72 r ran/_Z ir
SFX 72 r ria/_Z ir
SFX 72 r ries/_Z ir
SFX 72 r ria/_Z ir
SFX 72 r ríem/_Z ir
SFX 72 r ríeu/_Z ir
SFX 72 r rien/_Z ir
SFX 72 ir esca/_Z ir
SFX 72 r sca/_Z ir
SFX 72 ir esqui/_Z ir
SFX 72 ir eixi/_Z ir
SFX 72 ir esques/_Z ir
SFX 72 r sques/_Z ir
SFX 72 ir esquis/_Z ir
SFX 72 ir eixis/_Z ir
SFX 72 ir esca/_Z ir
SFX 72 r sca/_Z ir
SFX 72 ir esqui/_Z ir
SFX 72 ir eixi/_Z ir
SFX 72 r m/_Z ir
SFX 72 r guem/_Z ir
SFX 72 r u/_Z ir
SFX 72 r gueu/_Z ir
SFX 72 ir esquen/_Z ir
SFX 72 r squen/_Z ir
SFX 72 ir esquin/_Z ir
SFX 72 ir eixin/_Z ir
SFX 72 ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 72 r ra/_Z ir
SFX 72 r ssis/_Z ir
SFX 72 r res/_Z ir
SFX 72 r sses/_Z ir
SFX 72 ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 72 r ra/_Z ir
SFX 72 ir íssim/_Z ir
SFX 72 ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 72 ir íssem/_Z ir
SFX 72 ir íssiu/_Z ir
SFX 72 ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 72 ir ísseu/_Z ir
SFX 72 r ssin/_Z ir
SFX 72 r ren/_Z ir
SFX 72 r ssen/_Z ir
SFX 72 ir eix/_C ir
SFX 72 r x/_C ir
SFX 72 ir esca/_D ir
SFX 72 r sca/_D ir
SFX 72 ir esqui/_D ir
SFX 72 ir eixi/_D ir
SFX 72 r m/_C ir
SFX 72 r guem/_C ir
SFX 72 r u/_C ir
SFX 72 ir esquen/_C ir
SFX 72 r squen/_C ir
SFX 72 ir esquin/_C ir
SFX 72 ir eixin/_C ir

# Model de conjugació: ofrenar
SFX 73 Y 84
SFX 73 r r/_v_C_Y ar
SFX 73 r nt/_C ar
SFX 73 r t/_v_Y ar
SFX 73 r da/_Y ar
SFX 73 r ts/_Y ar
SFX 73 r des/_Y ar
SFX 73 ar o/_Z ar
SFX 73 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 73 enar èn/_Z ar
SFX 73 ar es/_Z ar
SFX 73 r 0/_Z ar
SFX 73 ar em/_Z ar
SFX 73 r m/_Z ar
SFX 73 ar eu/_Z ar
SFX 73 r u/_Z ar
SFX 73 ar en/_Z ar
SFX 73 r va/_Z ar
SFX 73 r ves/_Z ar
SFX 73 r va/_Z ar
SFX 73 ar àvem/_Z ar
SFX 73 ar àveu/_Z ar
SFX 73 r ven/_Z ar
SFX 73 ar í/_Z ar
SFX 73 r res/_Z ar
SFX 73 ar à/_Z ar
SFX 73 ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 73 ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 73 r ren/_Z ar
SFX 73 r ré/_Z ar
SFX 73 r ràs/_Z ar
SFX 73 r rà/_Z ar
SFX 73 r rem/_Z ar
SFX 73 r reu/_Z ar
SFX 73 r ran/_Z ar
SFX 73 r ria/_Z ar
SFX 73 r ries/_Z ar
SFX 73 r ria/_Z ar
SFX 73 r ríem/_Z ar
SFX 73 r ríeu/_Z ar
SFX 73 r rien/_Z ar
SFX 73 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 73 ar i/_Z ar
SFX 73 ar es/_Z ar
SFX 73 ar is/_Z ar
SFX 73 ar e/_Z ar
SFX 73 ar i/_Z ar
SFX 73 ar em/_Z ar
SFX 73 ar eu/_Z ar
SFX 73 ar en/_Z ar
SFX 73 ar in/_Z ar
SFX 73 ar és/_Z ar
SFX 73 r ra/_Z ar
SFX 73 ar às/_Z ar
SFX 73 ar essis/_Z ar
SFX 73 r res/_Z ar
SFX 73 r ssis/_Z ar
SFX 73 ar esses/_Z ar
SFX 73 r sses/_Z ar
SFX 73 ar és/_Z ar
SFX 73 r ra/_Z ar
SFX 73 ar às/_Z ar
SFX 73 ar éssim/_Z ar
SFX 73 ar àrem/_Z ar
SFX 73 ar àssim/_Z ar
SFX 73 ar éssem/_Z ar
SFX 73 ar àssem/_Z ar
SFX 73 ar éssiu/_Z ar
SFX 73 ar àreu/_Z ar
SFX 73 ar àssiu/_Z ar
SFX 73 ar ésseu/_Z ar
SFX 73 ar àsseu/_Z ar
SFX 73 ar essin/_Z ar
SFX 73 r ren/_Z ar
SFX 73 r ssin/_Z ar
SFX 73 ar essen/_Z ar
SFX 73 r ssen/_Z ar
SFX 73 r 0/_D ar
SFX 73 ar e/_D ar
SFX 73 ar i/_D ar
SFX 73 ar em/_C ar
SFX 73 r u/_C ar
SFX 73 ar eu/_C ar
SFX 73 ar en/_C ar
SFX 73 ar in/_C ar

# Model de conjugació: oir
SFX 74 Y 92
SFX 74 r r/_v_C_Y ir
SFX 74 r nt/_C ir
SFX 74 ir ït/_v_Y ir
SFX 74 ir ïda/_Y ir
SFX 74 ir ïts/_Y ir
SFX 74 ir ïdes/_Y ir
SFX 74 ir eixo/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir ïsc/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir esc/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir eixes/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir us/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir ïxes/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir eix/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir u/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir ïx/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir ïm/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir ïu/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir eixen/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir uen/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir ïxen/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir ïa/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir ïes/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir ïa/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir íem/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir íeu/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir ïen/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir í/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir ïres/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir í/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir ïren/_Z ir
SFX 74 r ré/_Z ir
SFX 74 r ràs/_Z ir
SFX 74 r rà/_Z ir
SFX 74 r rem/_Z ir
SFX 74 r reu/_Z ir
SFX 74 r ran/_Z ir
SFX 74 r ria/_Z ir
SFX 74 r ries/_Z ir
SFX 74 r ria/_Z ir
SFX 74 r ríem/_Z ir
SFX 74 r ríeu/_Z ir
SFX 74 r rien/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir esca/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir ïsca/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir esqui/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir eixi/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir esques/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir ïsques/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir esquis/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir eixis/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir esca/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir ïsca/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir esqui/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir eixi/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir ïm/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir ïguem/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir ïu/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir ïgueu/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir esquen/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir ïsquen/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir esquin/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir eixin/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir ïra/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir ïssis/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir ïres/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir ïsses/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir ïra/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir íssim/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir íssem/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir íssiu/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir ísseu/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir ïssin/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir ïren/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir ïssen/_Z ir
SFX 74 ir eix/_C ir
SFX 74 ir esca/_D ir
SFX 74 ir ïsca/_D ir
SFX 74 ir esqui/_D ir
SFX 74 ir eixi/_D ir
SFX 74 ir ïm/_C ir
SFX 74 ir ïguem/_C ir
SFX 74 ir ïu/_C ir
SFX 74 ir esquen/_C ir
SFX 74 ir ïsquen/_C ir
SFX 74 ir esquin/_C ir
SFX 74 ir eixin/_C ir

# Model de conjugació: omplir
SFX 75 Y 82
SFX 75 r r/_v_C_Y ir
SFX 75 r nt/_C ir
SFX 75 ir ert/_v_Y ir
SFX 75 r t/_v_Y ir
SFX 75 ir erta/_Y ir
SFX 75 r da/_Y ir
SFX 75 ir erts/_Y ir
SFX 75 r ts/_Y ir
SFX 75 ir ertes/_Y ir
SFX 75 r des/_Y ir
SFX 75 ir o/_Z ir
SFX 75 omplir òmplic/_Z ir
SFX 75 ir 0/_Z ir
SFX 75 ir es/_Z ir
SFX 75 r s/_Z ir
SFX 75 ir e/_Z ir
SFX 75 r 0/_Z ir
SFX 75 r m/_Z ir
SFX 75 r u/_Z ir
SFX 75 ir en/_Z ir
SFX 75 r n/_Z ir
SFX 75 r a/_Z ir
SFX 75 r es/_Z ir
SFX 75 r a/_Z ir
SFX 75 ir íem/_Z ir
SFX 75 ir íeu/_Z ir
SFX 75 r en/_Z ir
SFX 75 ir í/_Z ir
SFX 75 r res/_Z ir
SFX 75 ir í/_Z ir
SFX 75 ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 75 ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 75 r ren/_Z ir
SFX 75 r ré/_Z ir
SFX 75 r ràs/_Z ir
SFX 75 r rà/_Z ir
SFX 75 r rem/_Z ir
SFX 75 r reu/_Z ir
SFX 75 r ran/_Z ir
SFX 75 r ria/_Z ir
SFX 75 r ries/_Z ir
SFX 75 r ria/_Z ir
SFX 75 r ríem/_Z ir
SFX 75 r ríeu/_Z ir
SFX 75 r rien/_Z ir
SFX 75 omplir òmpliga/_Z ir
SFX 75 r 0/_Z ir
SFX 75 omplir òmpligues/_Z ir
SFX 75 r s/_Z ir
SFX 75 omplir òmpliga/_Z ir
SFX 75 r 0/_Z ir
SFX 75 r m/_Z ir
SFX 75 r guem/_Z ir
SFX 75 r u/_Z ir
SFX 75 r gueu/_Z ir
SFX 75 omplir òmpliguen/_Z ir
SFX 75 r n/_Z ir
SFX 75 ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 75 r ra/_Z ir
SFX 75 r ssis/_Z ir
SFX 75 r res/_Z ir
SFX 75 r sses/_Z ir
SFX 75 ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 75 r ra/_Z ir
SFX 75 ir íssim/_Z ir
SFX 75 ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 75 ir íssem/_Z ir
SFX 75 ir íssiu/_Z ir
SFX 75 ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 75 ir ísseu/_Z ir
SFX 75 r ssin/_Z ir
SFX 75 r ren/_Z ir
SFX 75 r ssen/_Z ir
SFX 75 r 0/_D ir
SFX 75 ir e/_D ir
SFX 75 omplir òmpliga/_D ir
SFX 75 r 0/_D ir
SFX 75 r m/_C ir
SFX 75 r guem/_C ir
SFX 75 r u/_C ir
SFX 75 omplir òmpliguen/_C ir
SFX 75 r n/_C ir
