resultats/hunspell/catalan.dic
ablenar/73
adotzenar/73
alenar/73
alienar/73
alquenar/73
alumenar/73
amargenar/73
anomenar/73
arenar/73
asserenar/73
atermenar/73
autoanomenar/73
besllumenar/73
cadenar/73
carenar/73
carmenar/73
cognomenar/73
concatenar/73
desalenar/73
desalienar/73
desarenar/73
desembenar/73
desencadenar/73
desencovenar/73
desenfrenar/73
desenravenar/73
desfrenar/73
deshidrogenar/73
desllemenar/73
desoir/74
desomplir/75
desoxigenar/73
destermenar/73
destrenar/73
eixamenar/73
embenar/73
emmenar/73
empenar/73
emplenar/73
encadenar/73
encovenar/73
enfrenar/73
enllemenar/73
enllumenar/73
enravenar/73
entreoir/74
entretzenar/73
esblenar/73
escarmenar/73
esgramenar/73
esllemenar/73
esmargenar/73
esmenar/73
esquenar/73
estamenar/73
extravenar/73
hidrogenar/73
malmenar/73
margenar/73
nitrogenar/73
nomenar/73
oferir/72
ofrenar/73
oir/74
omplir/75
oxigenar/73
reanomenar/73
refrenar/73
remenar/73
reomplir/75
sobrenomenar/73
sofrenar/73
termenar/73
terraplenar/73
